Colorado statutes. TITLE 16 Criminal Proceedings
PART 1
GENERAL PROVISIONS

16-5-101. Commencement of prosecution.

Unless otherwise provided by law, a criminal action for violation of any statute may be commenced in one of the following ways:

By the return of an indictment by a grand jury;

By the filing of an information in the district court;

By the filing of a felony complaint in the county court;

Prosecution of a misdemeanor, petty offense, or civil infraction may be commenced in the county court by:

The issuance of a summons and complaint;

The issuance of a summons following the filing of a complaint;

The filing of a complaint following an arrest; or

The filing of a summons and complaint following arrest, or, in the event that the offense is a civil infraction, by the issuance of a notice of penalty assessment pursuant to section 16-2-201.

The procedures governing felony complaints filed in the county court and warrants or summonses issued in connection therewith shall be in accordance with and as required by the applicable provisions of the rules of criminal procedure promulgated by the supreme court of Colorado.

Where the offense charged is a misdemeanor or petty offense, the action may be commenced in the county court as provided in subsection (1)(d) of this section, and the issues shall then be tried in the county court. As to misdemeanors or petty offenses thus filed and tried in the county court, the simplified procedures enumerated in part 1 of article 2 of this title shall be applicable.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 213, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-5-101.

L. 2021:

IP(1)(d) and (1)(d)(IV) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3162, § 170, effective March 1, 2022.

16-5-102. Summons to corporate defendant.

When a corporation is charged with the commission of an offense, the court shall issue a summons setting forth the nature of the offense and commanding the corporation to appear before the court at a certain time and place.

The summons for the appearance of a corporation may be served by a peace officer in the manner provided for service of summons upon a corporation in a civil action.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 213, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-5-102.

16-5-103. Identity theft victims - definitions.

A person whose identifying information has been mistakenly associated with an arrest, summons, summons and complaint, felony complaint, information, indictment, or conviction is a victim of identity theft for the purposes of this section. A victim of identify theft may proceed either through the judicial process in subsection (2) of this section or the Colorado bureau of investigation process in subsection (3) of this section.

If a criminal charge is not pending, a victim of identity theft may, with notice to the prosecutor, petition the court with jurisdiction over the arrest, summons, summons and complaint, felony complaint, information, indictment, or conviction to judicially determine the person's factual innocence. Alternatively, the court, on its own motion, may make such a determination in the case. If a criminal charge is pending, the prosecuting attorney may request the court to make such a determination. A judicial determination of factual innocence made pursuant to this section may be determined, with or without a hearing, upon declarations, affidavits, or police reports or upon any other relevant, material, reliable information submitted by the parties and records of the court.

If the court determines that there is no reasonable cause to believe that a victim of identity theft committed the offense for which the victim's identity has been mistakenly associated with an arrest, summons, summons and complaint, felony complaint, information, indictment, or conviction, the court shall find the victim factually innocent of that offense. If the victim is found factually innocent, the court shall issue an order certifying this determination.

After the court has determined that a person is factually innocent, the court shall provide the Colorado bureau of investigation with the order of factual innocence. Upon receipt of the order of factual innocence, the Colorado bureau of investigation shall modify the victim of identity theft's law enforcement-only and public criminal history record accordingly.

A court that issues a determination of factual innocence pursuant to this section may at any time vacate that determination if the petition, or information submitted in support of the petition, contains material misrepresentation or fraud. If the court vacates a determination of factual innocence, the court shall issue an order rescinding any orders made pursuant to this subsection (2).

(2.5) (a) A person who has had his or her identity stolen or used that is not associated with an arrest, summons, summons and complaint, felony complaint, information, indictment, or conviction may petition the district court in the county where the person lives for an order of factual innocence. A judicial determination of factual innocence made pursuant to this section may be determined, with or without a hearing, upon declarations, affidavits, or any other relevant, material, reliable information submitted by the parties and records of the court.

If the court finds that the person's identity was stolen or used by another, the court shall issue an order certifying this determination.

A court that issues a determination of factual innocence pursuant to this subsection (2.5) may at any time vacate that determination if the petition, or information submitted in support of the petition, contains material misrepresentation or fraud. If the court vacates a determination of factual innocence, the court shall issue an order rescinding any orders made pursuant to this subsection (2.5).

A victim of identity theft may contact the Colorado bureau of investigation and submit a records challenge to one or more criminal charges the victim of identity theft is alleged to have committed. The victim of identity theft shall include a copy of his or her fingerprints with the records challenge.

A Colorado bureau of investigation fingerprint examiner shall compare the submitted fingerprints in the records challenge to the fingerprints obtained in each criminal case that the victim of identity theft is making a records challenge.

The fingerprint examiner shall determine either that the fingerprints submitted in the records challenge are not the same as the individual arrested or that they are the same as the individual arrested.

If the fingerprint examiner determines the fingerprints submitted in the fingerprint challenge are not the same as the individual arrested, the Colorado bureau of investigation shall issue a letter of misidentification and shall modify the victim of identity theft's law enforcement-only and public criminal history record accordingly. The letter of misidentification shall state the holder of the letter is a victim of identity theft in each criminal case identified by the letter.

A person who knows or reasonably suspects that his or her identifying information has been unlawfully used by another person may initiate a law enforcement investigation by contacting the local law enforcement agency that has jurisdiction over the victim's residence or over the place where a crime was committed. Such agency shall take a police report of the matter, provide the complainant with a copy of that report, and begin an investigation of the facts. If the suspected crime was committed in a different jurisdiction, the local law enforcement agency may refer the matter to the local law enforcement agency where the suspected crime was committed for investigation of the facts.

For the purposes of this section:

"Biometric data" means data, such as fingerprints, voice prints, or retina and iris prints that capture, represent, or enable the reproduction of the unique physical attributes of an individual.

"Identifying information" means information that, alone or in conjunction with other information, identifies an individual, including but not limited to such individual's:

Name;

Address;

Birth date;

Telephone, social security, taxpayer identification, driver's license, identification card, alien registration, government passport, or checking, savings, or deposit account number;

Biometric data;

Unique electronic identification device; and

Telecommunication identifying device.

"Telecommunication identifying device" means a number, code, or magnetic or electronic device that enables the holder to use telecommunications technology to access an account; obtain money, goods, or services; or transfer funds.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 1736, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (HB 13-1146), ch. 43, p. 116, § 1, effective March 15.